test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kand41_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kand: # Noun (41) kand 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kand+N+Sg+Nom: kand
     kand+N+Sg+Gen: kanno
     kand+N+Sg+Par: kando
     kand+N+Sg+Ill: kando
     kand+N+Pl+Gen: [kandõ, kanda]
     kand+N+Pl+Par: [kandõ, kanda]
     kand+N+Pl+Ill: [kandõhe, kandõ, kandahe, kanda]
     kand+N+Pl+All: [kannõlõ, kannalõ]
